Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3123
Provisional license; approve or deny application.

The department shall approve or deny a complete application for a provisional license to practice psychology within one hundred fifty days after receipt of the application.

Laws 1999, LB 366, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.33;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1057.